Utah statutes.
78A-8-105.   Civil filing fees.

(1)  Except as provided in this section, the fees for a small claims action in justice court shall be the same as provided in Section 78A-2-301.

(2)  Fees collected in small claims actions filed in municipal justice court are remitted to the municipal treasurer.  Fees collected in small claims actions filed in a county justice court are remitted to the county treasurer.

(3)  The fee in the justice court for filing a notice of appeal for trial de novo in a court of record is $10.  The fee covers all services of the justice court on appeal but does not satisfy the trial de novo filing fee in the court of record.

